Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1468
Aircraft; operation while under influence of liquor or drug; second offense; penalty.

If a conviction under section 28-1466 is for a second offense, the person shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than five days and the court shall, as part of the judgment of conviction, order such person not to operate any aircraft for any purpose for a period of one year from the date ordered by the court. The order of the court shall be administered upon sentencing, upon final judgment of any appeal or review, or upon the date that any probation is revoked, whichever is later. If the aircraft which such person was operating or was actually physically controlling, while under the influence of alcoholic liquor or any drug, is registered in the name of such person, the aircraft shall be impounded by the court for a period of not less than two months nor greater than one year at the expense and risk of the owner thereof; except that any aircraft so impounded shall be released to the holder of a bona fide lien thereon, executed prior to such impounding, when possession of such aircraft is requested in writing by such lienholder for the purpose of foreclosing and satisfying the lien thereon.

Laws 1978, LB 903, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 772, § 2.